Hawaii statutes.
[§39A-361] Estimate of benefits. (a)
Each project party with a project agreement with the department shall estimate
the benefits derived from the use of the proceeds of special purpose revenue
bonds. The benefits estimated shall be based on the creation of new jobs and
potential effect on tax receipts. The format of and method for determining the
estimates shall be established by the department and shall be uniform for each
project party.

(b) To promote public understanding of the
role played by special purpose revenue bonds in providing benefits to the
general public, the department shall take appropriate steps to ensure public
access to and scrutiny of the estimates determined under subsection (a).

(c) The department shall adopt rules under
chapter 91 for the purposes of this section. [L 2012, c 147, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next